District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.21

Establishment and maintenance of foreign agencies.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 411, ch. 93, title 8, § 21
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1421.
1973 Ed., § 35-1121.